Missouri, session 2026, HB2596.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 376.1000, 376.1012, 376.1017, and 376.1240, RSMo, are
repealed and five new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 376.1000,
376.1012, 376.1017, 376.1240, and 1, to read as follows:
376.1000. 1. As used in sections 376.1000 to 376.1045, a "multiple employer self-
insured health plan" is any plan or arrangement which is not fully insured and which is either:
(1) Offered by a staff or employee leasing company; or
(2) Established or maintained for the purpose of offering or providing health, dental
or short-term disability benefits to employees of two or more employers and to two or more
self-employed individuals, each with at least one common-law employee, and their
dependents.
2. A plan or arrangement is considered fully insured only if an insurer licensed to
transact business in this state retains the ultimate responsibility for all benefits payable by a
contract or policy of insurance.
376.1012. Funds collected from the participating employers under multiple employer
self-insured health plans shall be held in trust subject to the following requirements:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

CCS SS HCS HB 2596 2
(1) A board of trustees elected by participating employers shall serve as fund
managers on behalf of participants. Trustees shall be plan participants. No participating
employer may be represented by more than one trustee. No trustee may represent more than
one employer. A minimum of three and a maximum of seven trustees may be elected.
Trustees may not receive remuneration but they may be reimbursed for actual and reasonable
expenses incurred in connection with duties as trustee. A trustee may not be an agent, or
broker for or an owner, officer or employee of any third-party administrator, insurance agency
or insurer utilized by the plan. The trustees shall have the authority to approve applications of
association members for participation in the arrangement and to contract with a licensed
third-party administrator to administer the day-to-day affairs of the plan;
(2) Each trustee shall be bonded in an amount of not less than one hundred fifty
thousand dollars by a licensed insurer;
(3) Investment of plan funds is subject to the same restrictions which are applicable to
insurers pursuant to sections 376.291 to 376.307; provided, however, that no foreign plan
shall be exempt under section 376.310 from the investment laws of this state unless such plan
is subject to laws in its state of domicile which are substantially similar to sections 376.1032
to 376.1045. All investments shall be managed by a bank or other investment entity licensed
to operate in Missouri;
(4) Trustees, on behalf of the plan, shall file an annual report with the director of the
department of commerce and insurance by March first [showing the condition and affairs of
the plan as of the preceding thirty-first day of December. The report shall be made on forms
prescribed by the director. The report shall summarize the financial condition of the fund,
itemize collections from participating employers, detail all fund expenditures and provide any
additional information which the director requires] in compliance with section 375.041.
More frequent reports may be required at the discretion of the director. The plan shall also
prepare and file a report with the director in compliance with section 375.1252 as it
applies to health organizations, and the provisions of section 375.1267 shall apply to
such reports.
376.1017. 1. A plan shall establish loss reserves for all incurred losses, both reported
and unreported, and for unearned premiums.
2. A plan also shall establish a surplus account equal to the greater of the following:
(1) [Three times the average paid monthly premium during the plan's most recent
fund year;
(2) For plans which do not yet have one fund year's experience, three times estimated
monthly premium; or
(3)] Six hundred thousand dollars; or

CCS SS HCS HB 2596 3
(2) An amount equal to two times the authorized control level risk-based capital,
as that term is defined in section 375.1250.
376.1240. 1. For purposes of this section, terms shall have the same meanings as
ascribed to them in section 376.1350, and the term "self-administered hormonal
contraceptive" shall mean a drug that is composed of one or more hormones and that is
approved by the Food and Drug Administration to prevent pregnancy, excluding emergency
contraception. Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to medications approved by
the Food and Drug Administration to terminate an existing pregnancy.
2. (1) Any health benefit plan delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in
this state on or after January 1, 2026, that provides coverage for self-administered hormonal
contraceptives shall provide coverage to reimburse a health care provider or dispensing entity
for the dispensing of a supply of self-administered hormonal contraceptives intended to last
up to ninety days, or intended to last up to one hundred eighty days for generic self-
administered hormonal contraceptives. The provisions of this subdivision shall no longer
be in effect after December 31, 2026.
(2) Any health benefit plan delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed
in this state on or after January 1, 2027, that provides coverage for self-administered
hormonal contraceptives shall provide coverage to reimburse a health care provider or
dispensing entity for the dispensing of a supply of self-administered hormonal
contraceptives, including generic and brand-name contraceptives, intended to last up
to one year.
3. The coverage required under this section shall not be subject to any greater
deductible or co-payment than other similar health care services provided by the health
benefit plan.
Section 1. If any provision of sections 376.1000, 376.1012, 376.1017, and 376.1240
or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such
determination shall not affect the provisions or applications of sections 376.1000,
376.1012, 376.1017, and 376.1240 which may be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and to that end the provisions of sections 376.1000, 376.1012,
376.1017, and 376.1240 are severable.
✔